Massachusetts, session 194th, H3614.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 40 of the General Laws is hereby further amended by inserting after Section 22A
the following section:—
Section 22A ½. Any city or town that adopts the provisions of this section may increase
the fine assessed for violations of handicap parking in the city or town by $450. The city or
town may add the additional $450 into a special municipal account for the city or town where the
violation occurred.
The monies shall be used solely for funding and implementing the Americans with
Disabilities Act on public property and in public buildings within the city or town. The city or
of 2

town’s commission on disabilities or a special commission shall investigate the needs of the said
city or town for implementation of ADA compliance.
of 2